Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 15. Biennial Report.

Sec. 10.50.750.
Biennial report required.

A limited liability company and a foreign limited liability company conducting affairs in this state shall file a biennial report within the time established by this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.755.
Contents of biennial report.

A biennial report must set out

the name of the company and the state or country where it is organized;

the address of the registered office of the company in this state, and the name of its registered agent in this state at that address, and, in the case of a foreign limited liability company, the address of its principal office in the state or country where it is organized;

the names and addresses of the managers of the company, or, if the company is not managed by a manager, the names and addresses of the members of the company;

the name and address of each person owning at least a five percent interest in the company and the percentage of interest owned by that person in the company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.760.
Filing of biennial report.

A biennial report required by AS

10.50.750

shall be filed with the department and is due before January 2 of the filing year. A limited liability company filing articles of organization and a foreign limited liability company registering during an even-numbered year shall file the biennial report each even-numbered year. A limited liability company filing articles of organization and a foreign limited liability company registering during an odd-numbered year shall file the biennial report each odd-numbered year. The biennial report is delinquent if not filed before February 1 of each odd- or even-numbered year as provided in this section.

Proof to the satisfaction of the department that on or before February 1 the report was deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, properly addressed with postage prepaid, is compliance with (a) of this section.

The department shall file the report if it conforms to the requirements of this chapter. If the department finds that the report does not conform to the requirements of this chapter, the report shall promptly be returned to the company for necessary corrections.

Upon receipt of a form from the department, a limited liability company shall file a biennial report within six months after original organization.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.765.
Filing interim notice of change of managers or managing members.

In the event of a change of the manager of a limited liability company or of a foreign limited liability company registered under this chapter, or of a member of the company, if the members manage the company, during the first year of the biennial reporting period, the company shall file a notice of change amending the biennial report of the company before the following January 2.

The notice shall be filed with the department and shall state the name and current mailing address of the manager or member not included in the company’s last filed biennial report, and the name of the person replaced and the office held.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)